Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
ENRICHMENT OF BREAD AND FLOUR

§328-71 Definitions. When used in
sections 328-71 to 328-76, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of health.

“Enriched” as applied to flour means the
addition to flour of the vitamins and other nutritional ingredients necessary
to make it conform to the definition and standard of identity of enriched
flour, or enriched bromated flour or enriched self-rising flour, as the case
may be, promulgated by the Federal Food and Drug Administration (21 C.F.R. Part
137), or as the same may be from time to time amended or modified.

“Flour” is limited to the foods defined as (A)
flour, white flour, wheat flour, plain flour, (B) bromated flour, (C)
self-rising flour, self-rising white flour, self-rising wheat flour, and (D)
phosphated flour, phosphated white flour, and phosphated wheat flour, in the
definitions and standards of identity promulgated by the Federal Food and Drug
Administration (21 C.F.R. Part 137), or as they may be amended, but does not
include special flours not used for bread, roll, bun, or biscuit baking, such
as specialty cake, pancake, and pastry flours.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a
partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, or an unincorporated
organization to the extent engaged in the commercial manufacture or sale of
flour, white bread or rolls.

“Rolls” includes plain white rolls and buns of
the semi-bread dough type, such as soft rolls, hamburger, hot dog, Parker
House, etc., hard rolls, such as Vienna, Kaiser, etc., all made without
fillings or icings, but shall not include yeast-raised sweet rolls or sweet
buns, cinnamon rolls or buns, butterfly rolls, etc.

“White bread” means any bread, whether baked in
a pan or on a hearth or screen, which is commonly known or usually represented
and sold as white bread, including, but not restricted to, Vienna bread, French
bread, and Italian bread. [L 1945, c 101, §1; RL 1945, §2246.01; RL 1955,
§51-55; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §328-71; am L 1977, c 53, §1]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted and definitions rearranged.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next